Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 35 State, State Agencies and Political Subdivisions; Actions by
or Against

Cross references. —

As to mandamus, see chapter 30 of this title.

As to quo warranto, see chapter 31 of this title.

As to claims against governmental entities, see chapter 39 of this title.

As to suits against state, see art. 1, § 8, Wyo. Const.

For provision that criminal prosecution shall be in name of state, see art. 5, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to setoffs in suits by state, see §

9-1-405

.

As to duty of attorney general to prosecute and defend all suits by or against the state, see §

9-1-603

.

As to power of cities and towns to sue and be sued, see §

15-1-103

.

As to actions by city of first class to recover fines or penalties, see §

15-3-402

.

As to civil actions by bondholders upon nonpayment of local improvement bonds, see §§

15-6-434

and

15-6-435

.

As to power of county to sue and be sued, see §

18-2-101

.

As to name in which county shall sue or be sued, see §

18-2-109

.

As to duty of county attorney, see §

18-3-302

.

As to powers of board of trustees of school district to sue and be sued, see §

21-3-111

.

As to right of citizen to sue in name of state to recover fines, penalties and forfeitures for benefit of school district, see §

21-13-206

.

As to power of state highway commission to sue and be sued, see §

24-2-101

.

As to maintenance of suits by Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission, see §

30-5-114

.

As to name in which suits brought in connection with Carey Act lands, see §

36-7-103

.

As to actions by board of land commissioners in connection with sale of state lands, see §

36-9-117

.

As to actions by state against railroad companies for failure to burn fireguards, see §

37-9-302

.

As to actions by county against railroads for failure to maintain depots within four miles of cities or towns, see §

37-9-403

.

As to actions against persons accepting rebates from public utilities, see §

37-12-209

.

As to actions for violation of orders of public service commission, see §

37-12-212

.

As to duty of attorney general to defend suits against the state or water users in the state with reference to interstate streams, see §

41-11-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties and Other Political Subdivisions §§ 680 to 845; 72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies, §§ 85 to 88, 90, 91, 94 to 107, 110, 111, 113 to 121.

64A C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 1922 to 1974; 81 C.J.S. States §§ 267 to 328.

§ 1-35-101.
Actions against state agencies deemed actions against state; jurisdiction.

Any action permitted
by law which is brought against the state loan and investment board,
board of land commissioners, public service commission of Wyoming,
state board of equalization of Wyoming or the trustees of the University
of Wyoming is an action against the state of Wyoming and no action
shall be brought against any of such boards, commissions or trustees
except in the courts of the state of Wyoming, and no action shall
be maintained against any of such boards, commissions or trustees
in any other jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 35, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 3-7601; W.S. 1957, § 1-1018; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-36-101

; Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state loan and investment board, see §

11-34-102

.

As to board of trustees of university of Wyoming, see §

21-17-201

.

As to board of land commissioners, see §

36-2-101

.

As to public service commission, see §

37-2-101

.

As to board of equalization, see §

39-11-102

.1.

Strict construction. —

It is generally held that statutes authorizing suit against the state are to be strictly construed, since they are in derogation of the state's sovereignty. Harrison v. Wyoming Liquor Comm'n, 63 Wyo. 13, 177 P.2d 397,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1947).

Waiver provisions are strictly construed. Williams v. Eaton, 443 F.2d 422, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 10184 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1971).

Claim is condition precedent. —

A formal claim, in proper form, exhibited to the state auditor, is a condition precedent to the filing of an action against the state of Wyoming, either under this section or directly against the state and whether or not there is liability insurance. Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

Section not applicable to state agency not enumerated therein.
—

This section cannot be read as though it included a board or commission which has not been enumerated therein. Harrison v. Wyoming Liquor Comm'n, 63 Wyo. 13, 177 P.2d 397,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1947).

There is no authority to sue the board of trustees of the university of Wyoming;

it is not “permitted by law.” Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

A suit against the university of Wyoming and its trustees for damages for injuries sustained when a child fell from a dormitory window should have named the state of Wyoming and not the university and its trustees, if it is possible to sue the state directly. Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

Authority of the board of trustees of the university of Wyoming to sue or be sued cannot be inferred from this section, declaring any suit against the trustees of the university of Wyoming to be an action against the state of Wyoming, because of the introductory words appearing in the section, “Any action permitted by law, which shall be brought against … the trustees of the university of Wyoming is hereby declared to be an action against the State of Wyoming.” Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

Immunity waived only as to actions in state courts. —

By law immunity of the trustees of the university of Wyoming from suit is waived only as to actions in the courts of the state of Wyoming, not as to the suits in the federal courts. Williams v. Eaton, 443 F.2d 422, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 10184 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1971).

Where there is no clear intent in a waiver of immunity statute to subject state agencies to actions in the federal courts, such suits may not be maintained. Williams v. Eaton, 443 F.2d 422, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 10184 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1971).

State agency not suable in federal court. —

A state agency, functioning as an arm, an alter ego of the state, cannot be sued in federal court because of the prohibition of such suits by the eleventh amendment of the federal constitution, unless the agency waives its eleventh amendment immunity or consents to suit. Atchison v. Nelson, 460 F. Supp. 1102, 1978 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14320 (D. Wyo. 1978).

Although injunctive and declaratory relief available. —

The immunity conferred on state agencies and individuals does not extend so far as to prevent injunctive or declaratory relief. Atchison v. Nelson, 460 F. Supp. 1102, 1978 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14320 (D. Wyo. 1978).

Immunity under Declaratory Judgments Act. —

The university of Wyoming and the board of trustees of that institution are immune from suit under the Declaratory Judgments Act. Retail Clerks Local 187 v. University of Wyo., 531 P.2d 884,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1975).

Where state officer required to use state property to afford
relief demanded. —

A suit is against the state wherein a state officer or agency is, or will be, required to use state property or funds in order to afford the relief demanded, or which seeks to compel officers or agents to do acts which will impose contractual liability on the state. Retail Clerks Local 187 v. University of Wyoming, 531 P.2d 884,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1975).

Applied

in

Board of Trustees v. Bell, 662 P.2d 410,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 229 (1972).

For case note, “Filing of Claims Against the State: Is ‘Almost’ Good Enough? Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 582 P.2d 583,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 259 (1979).

For case note, “Sovereign Immunity of the State of Wyoming, Oroz v. Board of County Comm'rs, 575 P.2d 1155,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 274

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Contributory negligence as defense to action by state, 1 ALR2d 827.

Tortious breach of contract as within consent by state to suit on contract, 1 ALR2d 864.

Immunity from suit of governmental liquor control agency, 9 ALR2d 1292.

Declaratory relief with respect to unemployment compensation as suit against state, 14 ALR2d 826.

Liability of state or governmental unit or agency for damages in tort in operating hospital as affected by capacity to be sued, 25 ALR2d 203.

Maintainability of partition action where state owned an undivided interest in property, 59 ALR2d 937.

Sovereign immunity doctrine as precluding suit against sister state for tort committed within forum state, 81 ALR3d 1239.

Tort liability of college, university, fraternity or sorority for injury or death of member or prospective member by hazing or initiation activity, 68 ALR4th 228.

§ 1-35-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979,
ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to authority to carry liability insurance, see §

15-1-104

.

As to presentation and allowance of claims against cities, see §

15-1-125

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 197, § 1, related to waiver of governmental immunity to extent of liability insurance.

§ 1-35-103.
Violation
of state contracts to be reported to attorney general; investigation;
action to recover damages; employment of special assistants.

Any officer, board or commission of the state of Wyoming, or their legal counsel, responsible for the enforcement of any contract between the state of Wyoming and any person, having reason to believe that there has been a violation of the terms of the contract to the damage of the state of Wyoming, shall report the matter to the attorney general of the state of Wyoming. The attorney general shall make such investigation of the matter as is necessary. Upon completion of the investigation and finding of probable damages to the state of Wyoming, the attorney general may bring suit in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover all damages that the state of Wyoming may have incurred by reason of the breach of contract, or for any money or other property that may be due on the contract. Subject to the governor’s approval he may employ specially qualified assistants or counsel to aid in any investigation of such action.

A contract with the state of Wyoming includes any contract, lease or instrument in writing entered into by any board, officer or commission of the state of Wyoming for the benefit of the state whether the contract is made in the name of the state of Wyoming or in the name of the officer, board or commission.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 66, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 3-7602; W.S. 1957, § 1-1019; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-36-103

; Laws 2004, ch. 132, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), inserted “or their legal counsel” following “commission of the state of Wyoming.”

State officers are not given right to sue in their own names.
—

The officers, boards and commissions mentioned in this section are not given the right to sue in their own names. They must sue in the name of the state. They are but instrumentalities or agencies, as there always must be, through which the state initiates its activities. Harrison v. Wyoming Liquor Comm'n, 63 Wyo. 13, 177 P.2d 397,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1947).

And they are not rendered subject to suit by others. —

From the fact that officers, boards and commissions of the state may sue, as provided in this section, it does not follow that they are also subject to suit by others. Harrison v. Wyoming Liquor Comm'n, 63 Wyo. 13, 177 P.2d 397,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1947).

Validity of specialist employment contracts. —

Contract for employment of specialists to receive as compensation to extent of 25% of amount recovered was held valid and properly authorized by the legislature. Bourne v. Cole, 53 Wyo. 31, 77 P.2d 617,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1938). See also MacDougall v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 48 Wyo. 493, 49 P.2d 663,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1935).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recovery based on tortfeasor's profits in action for procuring breach of contract, 5 ALR4th 1276.

Recovery of punitive damages for breach of building or construction contract, 40 ALR4th 110.

§ 1-35-104.
Actions under control of attorney general; settlement or compromise
with approval of governor.

The attorney general
shall control all investigations and actions instituted and conducted
in behalf of the state as provided in W.S.

1-35-103

and has full discretionary powers to prosecute all investigations
and litigation and, with the approval of the governor, to settle,
compromise or dismiss the actions.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 66, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 3-7603; W.S. 1957, § 1-1020; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-36-104

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Attorney's authority to compromise suit for government, 30 ALR2d 944.

§ 1-35-105.
Compensation of assistants and court costs to be paid from sums recovered;
limitation on amount.

Any contract of employment
providing for reimbursement of court costs incurred in connection
with or fees to be paid for the specially qualified assistants and
counsel whose services may be employed shall provide that such fees
and costs shall only be paid from moneys recovered by the state as
the result of any investigations, litigation or compromise in connection
with which the services are rendered. The total obligation created
by the employment for reimbursement of court costs and payment of
fees for services rendered in each particular investigation or litigation
shall not exceed one-half (1/2) of the amount recovered in the proceedings.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 66, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 3-7605; W.S. 1957, § 1-1022; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-36-105

.

§ 1-35-106.
Disposition of sums recovered; appropriation for costs and fees.

All moneys collected
by virtue of W.S.

1-35-103

through

1-35-106

shall be paid into the state treasury of the state of
Wyoming, and there is hereby appropriated out of any monies so recovered
a sum not exceeding one-half (1/2) of the amount recovered to pay the
costs and fees for the special assistants, to be paid by the warrant
drawn on the state treasury.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 66, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 3-7606; W.S. 1957, § 1-1023; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-36-106

.

§ 1-35-107.
Actions by state or instrumentality, county, municipality or school
district; judgment and enforcement.

The state of Wyoming
or any department or instrumentality thereof, county, incorporated
city or town and school district therein is authorized to bring an
action in any court having jurisdiction to recover any money due it
upon any contract or other liability or obligation. In any such action
the court shall enter judgment for the amount found to be due the
state of Wyoming or any of the above entities, and any such judgment
may be enforced by levy upon execution or by any other process provided
by law.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 36, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 3-7607; W.S. 1957, § 1-1024; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-36-107

.

Cross references. —

As to enforcement of judgments, see chapter 17 of this title.

Editor's notes. —

In connection with this section, see MacDougall v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 48 Wyo. 493, 49 P.2d 663 (1935); Bourne v. Cole, 53 Wyo. 31, 77 P.2d 617 (1938).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of bidder for state or municipal contract to rescind bid on ground that bid was based upon his own mistake or that of his employee, 2 ALR4th 991.

§ 1-35-108.
Deposit of security by state, municipality or agency.

The state of Wyoming,
a county, city or town, or any departments or agencies thereof or
any party acting for or on behalf of any such department or agency
in his official capacity shall not be required to deposit security
for damages, fees or costs in any civil, criminal or special proceeding
instituted or pending in any court or special tribunal in the state
unless expressly required so to do by the rule, statute or ordinance
generally providing for deposit of security for such purposes.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 59, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.6; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-127; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 1.

1-35-109.
Legislature and legislators as party to actions; properly naming party.

In any action challenging any official act of the legislature as a whole and naming the legislature or any member thereof as a party, the proper party shall be “The Legislature of the State of Wyoming.” In any such action challenging an official act of either body of the legislature or a committee of the legislature the proper party shall be the appropriate body or committee of “the Legislature of the State of Wyoming”.

In any action challenging any official act of a member of the state legislature, the legislator shall be designated only by the legislative office held unless the action seeks relief from actions of the legislator other than actions taken in his official capacity.

Any individual named in an action in which the proper party is the legislature or a body of the legislature or who has otherwise been improperly named has the substantive right to petition the court to have his name removed from the action.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to require naming the legislature as a party when the claim or cause of action arises from the enforcement or operation of any law.

History.

2017 ch. 163, § 1, effective March 6, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 163, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

Generally. —

Wyoming citizens lacked standing to challenge
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-35-109

where they failed to allege taxpayer standing, one citizen’s status as an elected representative provided no basis for standing, they failed to allege any personal interest distinguishable from any other citizen’s interest, and they sought prospect remedies only.
Allred v. Bebout, 2018 WY 8, 409 P.3d 260,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2018).